language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0136 Y 66
SFX 0136 ń li .
SFX 0136 ń ni .
SFX 0136 ń nimoj .
SFX 0136 ń nimy .
SFX 0136 ń nitaj .
SFX 0136 ń nitej .
SFX 0136 ń niće .
SFX 0136 ń nje .
SFX 0136 ń njemoj .
SFX 0136 ń njemy .
SFX 0136 ń njena .
SFX 0136 ń njenaj .
SFX 0136 ń njene .
SFX 0136 ń njeneho .
SFX 0136 ń njenej .
SFX 0136 ń njeneje .
SFX 0136 ń njeneju .
SFX 0136 ń njenemu .
SFX 0136 ń njeni .
SFX 0136 ń njenja .
SFX 0136 ń njenjach .
SFX 0136 ń njenjam .
SFX 0136 ń njenje .
SFX 0136 ń njenjemi .
SFX 0136 ń njenjom .
SFX 0136 ń njenjomaj .
SFX 0136 ń njenjow .
SFX 0136 ń njenju .
SFX 0136 ń njenoh .
SFX 0136 ń njenom .
SFX 0136 ń njenu .
SFX 0136 ń njeny .
SFX 0136 ń njenych .
SFX 0136 ń njenym .
SFX 0136 ń njenymaj .
SFX 0136 ń njenymi .
SFX 0136 ń njetaj .
SFX 0136 ń njetej .
SFX 0136 ń njeće .
SFX 0136 ń nješ .
SFX 0136 ń nu .
SFX 0136 ń ny .
SFX 0136 ń nych .
SFX 0136 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0136 ń nychmy .
SFX 0136 ń nychu .
SFX 0136 ń nyli .
SFX 0136 ń nywši .
SFX 0136 ń nyć .
SFX 0136 ń nył .
SFX 0136 ń nyła .
SFX 0136 ń nyłe .
SFX 0136 ń nyło .
SFX 0136 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0136 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0136 ń nyštej .
SFX 0136 ń nyšće .
SFX 0136 ń ła .
SFX 0136 ń łe .
SFX 0136 ń ło .
SFX 0136 ń łoj .
SFX 0136 ń ńmoj .
SFX 0136 ń ńmy .
SFX 0136 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0136 ń ńtej .
SFX 0136 ń ńće .

SFX 0137 Y 76
SFX 0137 li ni ..
SFX 0137 li nimoj ..
SFX 0137 li nimy ..
SFX 0137 li nitaj ..
SFX 0137 li nitej ..
SFX 0137 li niće ..
SFX 0137 li njaca ..
SFX 0137 li njacaj ..
SFX 0137 li njace ..
SFX 0137 li njaceho ..
SFX 0137 li njacej ..
SFX 0137 li njaceje ..
SFX 0137 li njaceju ..
SFX 0137 li njacemu ..
SFX 0137 li njacoh ..
SFX 0137 li njacom ..
SFX 0137 li njacu ..
SFX 0137 li njacy ..
SFX 0137 li njacych ..
SFX 0137 li njacym ..
SFX 0137 li njacymaj ..
SFX 0137 li njacymi ..
SFX 0137 li nje ..
SFX 0137 li njech ..
SFX 0137 li njechmoj ..
SFX 0137 li njechmy ..
SFX 0137 li njechu ..
SFX 0137 li njemoj ..
SFX 0137 li njemy ..
SFX 0137 li njena ..
SFX 0137 li njenaj ..
SFX 0137 li njene ..
SFX 0137 li njeneho ..
SFX 0137 li njenej ..
SFX 0137 li njeneje ..
SFX 0137 li njeneju ..
SFX 0137 li njenemu ..
SFX 0137 li njeni ..
SFX 0137 li njenja ..
SFX 0137 li njenjach ..
SFX 0137 li njenjam ..
SFX 0137 li njenje ..
SFX 0137 li njenjemi ..
SFX 0137 li njenjom ..
SFX 0137 li njenjomaj ..
SFX 0137 li njenjow ..
SFX 0137 li njenju ..
SFX 0137 li njenoh ..
SFX 0137 li njenom ..
SFX 0137 li njenu ..
SFX 0137 li njeny ..
SFX 0137 li njenych ..
SFX 0137 li njenym ..
SFX 0137 li njenymaj ..
SFX 0137 li njenymi ..
SFX 0137 li njetaj ..
SFX 0137 li njetej ..
SFX 0137 li njeće ..
SFX 0137 li nješ ..
SFX 0137 li nješe ..
SFX 0137 li nještaj ..
SFX 0137 li nještej ..
SFX 0137 li nješće ..
SFX 0137 li njo ..
SFX 0137 li nu ..
SFX 0137 li nyli ..
SFX 0137 li nyć ..
SFX 0137 li nył ..
SFX 0137 li nyła ..
SFX 0137 li nyłe ..
SFX 0137 li nyło ..
SFX 0137 li nyłoj ..
SFX 0137 li ła ..
SFX 0137 li łe ..
SFX 0137 li ło ..
SFX 0137 li łoj ..

SFX 0138 Y 17
SFX 0138 a aj .
SFX 0138 a e .
SFX 0138 a eho .
SFX 0138 a ej .
SFX 0138 a eje .
SFX 0138 a eju .
SFX 0138 a emu .
SFX 0138 a oh .
SFX 0138 a om .
SFX 0138 a u .
SFX 0138 a y .
SFX 0138 a ych .
SFX 0138 a ym .
SFX 0138 a ymaj .
SFX 0138 a ymi .
SFX 0138 a źe .
SFX 0138 a źi .

SFX 0139 Y 34
SFX 0139 a aj .
SFX 0139 a e .
SFX 0139 a eho .
SFX 0139 a ej .
SFX 0139 a eje .
SFX 0139 a eju .
SFX 0139 a emu .
SFX 0139 a o .
SFX 0139 a oh .
SFX 0139 a om .
SFX 0139 a u .
SFX 0139 a y .
SFX 0139 a ych .
SFX 0139 a ym .
SFX 0139 a ymaj .
SFX 0139 a ymi .
SFX 0139 a ša .
SFX 0139 a še .
SFX 0139 a šeho .
SFX 0139 a šej .
SFX 0139 a šeje .
SFX 0139 a šeju .
SFX 0139 a šemu .
SFX 0139 a ši .
SFX 0139 a šich .
SFX 0139 a šim .
SFX 0139 a šimaj .
SFX 0139 a šimi .
SFX 0139 a šo .
SFX 0139 a šoh .
SFX 0139 a šom .
SFX 0139 a šu .
SFX 0139 a źe .
SFX 0139 a źi .

SFX 0140 Y 9
SFX 0140 a ach .
SFX 0140 a am .
SFX 0140 a ami .
SFX 0140 a o .
SFX 0140 a om .
SFX 0140 a omaj .
SFX 0140 a ow .
SFX 0140 a u .
SFX 0140 a źe .

SFX 0141 Y 15
SFX 0141 ša še ..
SFX 0141 ša šeho ..
SFX 0141 ša šej ..
SFX 0141 ša šeje ..
SFX 0141 ša šeju ..
SFX 0141 ša šemu ..
SFX 0141 ša ši ..
SFX 0141 ša šich ..
SFX 0141 ša šim ..
SFX 0141 ša šimaj ..
SFX 0141 ša šimi ..
SFX 0141 ša šoh ..
SFX 0141 ša šom ..
SFX 0141 ša šu ..
SFX 0141 ša že ..

SFX 0142 Y 33
SFX 0142 ša scy ..
SFX 0142 ša ska ..
SFX 0142 ša skaj ..
SFX 0142 ša ske ..
SFX 0142 ša skeho ..
SFX 0142 ša skej ..
SFX 0142 ša skeje ..
SFX 0142 ša skeju ..
SFX 0142 ša skemu ..
SFX 0142 ša ski ..
SFX 0142 ša skich ..
SFX 0142 ša skim ..
SFX 0142 ša skimaj ..
SFX 0142 ša skimi ..
SFX 0142 ša sko ..
SFX 0142 ša skoh ..
SFX 0142 ša skom ..
SFX 0142 ša sku ..
SFX 0142 ša še ..
SFX 0142 ša šeho ..
SFX 0142 ša šej ..
SFX 0142 ša šeje ..
SFX 0142 ša šeju ..
SFX 0142 ša šemu ..
SFX 0142 ša ši ..
SFX 0142 ša šich ..
SFX 0142 ša šim ..
SFX 0142 ša šimaj ..
SFX 0142 ša šimi ..
SFX 0142 ša šoh ..
SFX 0142 ša šom ..
SFX 0142 ša šu ..
SFX 0142 ša že ..

SFX 0143 Y 11
SFX 0143 ój oja ..
SFX 0143 ój ojach ..
SFX 0143 ój ojam ..
SFX 0143 ój oje ..
SFX 0143 ój ojej ..
SFX 0143 ój ojemi ..
SFX 0143 ój ojo ..
SFX 0143 ój ojom ..
SFX 0143 ój ojomaj ..
SFX 0143 ój ojow ..
SFX 0143 ój oju ..

SFX 0144 Y 55
SFX 0144 ń nje .
SFX 0144 ń njemoj .
SFX 0144 ń njemy .
SFX 0144 ń njena .
SFX 0144 ń njenaj .
SFX 0144 ń njene .
SFX 0144 ń njeneho .
SFX 0144 ń njenej .
SFX 0144 ń njeneje .
SFX 0144 ń njeneju .
SFX 0144 ń njenemu .
SFX 0144 ń njeni .
SFX 0144 ń njenja .
SFX 0144 ń njenjach .
SFX 0144 ń njenjam .
SFX 0144 ń njenje .
SFX 0144 ń njenjemi .
SFX 0144 ń njenjom .
SFX 0144 ń njenjomaj .
SFX 0144 ń njenjow .
SFX 0144 ń njenju .
SFX 0144 ń njenoh .
SFX 0144 ń njenom .
SFX 0144 ń njenu .
SFX 0144 ń njeny .
SFX 0144 ń njenych .
SFX 0144 ń njenym .
SFX 0144 ń njenymaj .
SFX 0144 ń njenymi .
SFX 0144 ń njetaj .
SFX 0144 ń njetej .
SFX 0144 ń njeće .
SFX 0144 ń nješ .
SFX 0144 ń nu .
SFX 0144 ń ny .
SFX 0144 ń nych .
SFX 0144 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0144 ń nychmy .
SFX 0144 ń nychu .
SFX 0144 ń nyli .
SFX 0144 ń nywši .
SFX 0144 ń nyć .
SFX 0144 ń nył .
SFX 0144 ń nyła .
SFX 0144 ń nyłe .
SFX 0144 ń nyło .
SFX 0144 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0144 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0144 ń nyštej .
SFX 0144 ń nyšće .
SFX 0144 ń ńmoj .
SFX 0144 ń ńmy .
SFX 0144 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0144 ń ńtej .
SFX 0144 ń ńće .

SFX 0145 Y 8
SFX 0145 tu tach ..
SFX 0145 tu tam ..
SFX 0145 tu tami ..
SFX 0145 tu tomaj ..
SFX 0145 tu tow ..
SFX 0145 tu ty ..
SFX 0145 tu tá ..
SFX 0145 tu će ..

SFX 0146 Y 13
SFX 0146 óh oha ..
SFX 0146 óh ohach ..
SFX 0146 óh ohaj ..
SFX 0146 óh oham ..
SFX 0146 óh ohami ..
SFX 0146 óh ohej ..
SFX 0146 óh ohojo ..
SFX 0146 óh ohom ..
SFX 0146 óh ohomaj ..
SFX 0146 óh ohow ..
SFX 0146 óh ohu ..
SFX 0146 óh oze ..
SFX 0146 óh ožo ..

SFX 0147 Y 31
SFX 0147 tša tše ...
SFX 0147 tša tšeho ...
SFX 0147 tša tšej ...
SFX 0147 tša tšeje ...
SFX 0147 tša tšeju ...
SFX 0147 tša tšemu ...
SFX 0147 tša tši ...
SFX 0147 tša tšich ...
SFX 0147 tša tšim ...
SFX 0147 tša tšimaj ...
SFX 0147 tša tšimi ...
SFX 0147 tša tšo ...
SFX 0147 tša tšoh ...
SFX 0147 tša tšom ...
SFX 0147 tša tšu ...
SFX 0147 tša ćiša ...
SFX 0147 tša ćiše ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišeho ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišej ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišeje ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišeju ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišemu ...
SFX 0147 tša ćiši ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišich ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišim ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišimaj ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišimi ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišo ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišoh ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišom ...
SFX 0147 tša ćišu ...
